California, session 20252026, SB733.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 680 of the Penal Code is amended to read:680. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Sexual Assault Victims’ DNA Bill of Rights.”(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) and forensic identification analysis is a powerful law enforcement tool for identifying and prosecuting sexual assault offenders.(2) Existing law requires an adult arrested for or charged with a felony and a juvenile adjudicated for a felony to submit DNA samples as a result of that arrest, charge, or adjudication.(3) Victims of sexual assault have a strong interest in the investigation and prosecution of their cases.(4) Law enforcement agencies have an obligation to victims of sexual assault in the proper handling, retention, and timely DNA testing of rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence and to be responsive to victims concerning the developments of forensic testing and the investigation of their cases.(5) The growth of the Department of Justice’s Cal-DNA databank and the national databank through the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) makes it possible for many sexual assault perpetrators to be identified after their first offense, provided that rape kit evidence is analyzed in a timely manner.(6) Timely DNA analysis of rape kit evidence is a core public safety issue affecting men, women, and children in the State of California. It is the intent of the Legislature, in order to further public safety, to encourage DNA analysis of rape kit evidence within the time limit imposed by paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 803.(7) DNA reference samples collected directly from a victim of sexual assault, and reference samples of DNA collected from any individual that were voluntarily provided for the purpose of exclusion, shall be protected as provided in Section 679.12.(c) To ensure that sexual assault forensic evidence is analyzed within the timeframe required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 803 and to ensure the longest possible statute of limitations for sex offenses, including sex offenses designated pursuant to those subparagraphs, the following shall occur:(1) A law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction a sex offense specified in Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a occurred shall do one of the following for sexual assault forensic evidence received by the law enforcement agency on or after January 1, 2016:(A) Submit sexual assault forensic evidence to the crime lab within 20 days after it is booked into evidence.(B) Ensure that a rapid turnaround DNA program is in place to submit forensic evidence collected from the victim of a sexual assault directly from the medical facility where the victim is examined to the crime lab within five days after the evidence is obtained from the victim.(2) The crime lab shall do one of the following for sexual assault forensic evidence received by the crime lab on or after January 1, 2016:(A) Process sexual assault forensic evidence, create DNA profiles when able, and upload qualifying DNA profiles into CODIS as soon as practically possible but no later than 120 days after initially receiving the evidence.(B) Transmit the sexual assault forensic evidence to another crime lab as soon as practically possible, but no later than 30 days after initially receiving the evidence, for processing of the evidence for the presence of DNA. If a DNA profile is created, the transmitting crime lab shall upload the profile into CODIS as soon as practically possible but no longer than 30 days after being notified about the presence of DNA.(3) This subdivision does not require a lab to test all items of forensic evidence obtained in a sexual assault forensic evidence examination. A lab is considered to be in compliance with the guidelines of this section if representative samples of the evidence are processed by the lab in an effort to detect the foreign DNA of the perpetrator.(4) This section does not require a DNA profile to be uploaded into CODIS if the DNA profile does not meet federal guidelines regarding the uploading of DNA profiles into CODIS.(5) For purposes of this section, a “rapid turnaround DNA program” is a program for the training of sexual assault team personnel in the selection of representative samples of forensic evidence from the victim to be the best evidence, based on the medical evaluation and patient history, the collection and preservation of that evidence, and the transfer of the evidence directly from the medical facility to the crime lab, which is adopted pursuant to a written agreement between the law enforcement agency, the crime lab, and the medical facility where the sexual assault team is based.(6) For the purpose of this section, “law enforcement” means the law enforcement agency with the primary responsibility for investigating an alleged sexual assault.(d) (1) Upon the request of a sexual assault victim, the law enforcement agency investigating a violation of Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a shall inform the victim of the status of the DNA testing of the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from the victim’s case. The law enforcement agency may, at its discretion, require that the victim’s request be in writing. The law enforcement agency shall respond to the victim’s request with either an oral or written communication, or by email, if an email address is available. This subdivision does not require that the law enforcement agency communicate with the victim or the victim’s designee regarding the status of DNA testing absent a specific request from the victim or the victim’s designee.(2) A sexual assault victim has the right to access the Department of Justice’s SAFE-T database portal consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 680.3 for information involving their own forensic kit and the status of the kit.(3) A sexual assault victim has the right to be informed of the following:(A) Whether or not a DNA profile of the assailant was obtained from the testing of the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from their case.(B) Whether or not the DNA profile of the assailant developed from the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence has been entered into the Department of Justice Data Bank or the federal Department of Justice or Federal Bureau of Investigation CODIS database of case evidence.(C) Whether or not there is a confirmed match between the DNA profile of the assailant developed from the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence and a DNA profile contained in the Department of Justice Convicted Offender DNA Database, provided that disclosure would not impede or compromise an ongoing investigation.(4) This subdivision is intended to encourage law enforcement agencies to notify victims of information that is in their possession. It does not affect the manner of or frequency with which the Department of Justice provides this information to law enforcement agencies.(e) If the law enforcement agency does not analyze DNA evidence within six months prior to the time limit established by paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 803, a victim of a sexual assault offense specified in Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a shall be informed, either orally or in writing, of that fact by the law enforcement agency.(f) (1) If the law enforcement agency intends to destroy or dispose of rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from an unsolved sexual assault case, a victim of a violation of Section 261, 261.5, 286, 287, or 289 or former Section 262 or 288a shall be given written notification by the law enforcement agency of that intention.(2) A law enforcement agency shall not destroy or dispose of rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from an unsolved sexual assault case before at least 20 years or, if the victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the alleged offense, before the victim’s 40th birthday.(g) Written notification under subdivision (e) or (f) shall be made at least 60 days prior to the destruction or disposal of the rape kit evidence or other crime scene evidence from an unsolved sexual assault case.(h) (1) A sexual assault victim may designate a sexual assault victim advocate, or other support person of the victim’s choosing, to act as a recipient of the above information required to be provided by this section.(2) A sexual assault survivor who is 18 years of age or older and who is undecided whether to report to law enforcement at the time of an examination may request that all medical evidence collected from them not be tested. A kit for which this request has been made shall not be tested and shall not be subject to the requirements of this section, Section 680.3, or Section 680.4, with the exception that the investigating agency in possession of the kit shall follow the requirements of subdivisions (f) and (g).(A) If this request is made at the time of the examination, the medical facility shall not submit the kit to a crime laboratory, and the investigating agency shall retain the kit until the sexual assault survivor requests testing.(B) If this request is made after the examination, the request may be directed to the investigating agency. If the kit has not yet been submitted to a crime laboratory at the time the request is received, the kit shall be retained by the investigating agency. If the kit has already been submitted to a laboratory but DNA testing has not yet begun, the investigating agency shall notify the laboratory of the request and the untested kit shall be returned to the investigating agency and retained.(C) For purposes of this section, the transfer of a sexual assault kit by a medical facility to a crime laboratory representative solely for secure transport, intake, or evidence triage on behalf of the investigating agency shall not constitute submission for testing. All such transfers shall be documented in the chain of custody record or other state-approved tracking system, and shall not affect statutory retention timelines or survivor notification requirements.(3) A sexual assault survivor who has requested that their kit not be tested may later request that their kit be tested, regardless of whether they also decide to make a report to law enforcement.(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that a law enforcement agency responsible for providing information under subdivision (d) do so in a timely manner and, upon request of the victim or the victim’s designee, advise the victim or the victim’s designee of any significant changes in the information of which the law enforcement agency is aware. In order to be entitled to receive notice under this section, the victim or the victim’s designee shall keep appropriate authorities informed of the name, address, telephone number, and email address of the person to whom the information should be provided and any changes of the name, address, telephone number, and email address, if an email address is available.(j) A defendant or person accused or convicted of a crime against the victim shall have no standing to object to a failure to comply with this section. The failure to provide a right or notice to a sexual assault victim under this section may not be used by a defendant to seek to have the conviction or sentence set aside.(k) The sole civil or criminal remedy available to a sexual assault victim for a law enforcement agency’s failure to fulfill its responsibilities under this section is standing to file a writ of mandamus to require compliance with subdivision (e) or (f).SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.